Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5437.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-25-14 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-25 entitled "Jails and
Prisons" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-25-14. Conveyance of unauthorized articles to or from institutions.
(a) Every person who shall convey or cause to be conveyed into the adult correctional
institutions, or the training school for youth, any article without first obtaining the consent of the
director of corrections, or the executive director of the division of youth development (DYD) at the
department of children, youth and families; or who shall convey from the institutions or from the
training school for youth, any article without the consent of the director of corrections or the
executive director of the DYD, shall be punished, upon conviction, by imprisonment for not more
than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(b) Every person who shall convey or cause to be conveyed to any prisoner or to any
resident at the training school for youth any drugs, tobacco or any article that could be used as a
weapon, without first obtaining the consent of the director of corrections or the executive director
of the DYD, may be punished, upon conviction, by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years,
or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(c) For the purposes of subsection (b) of this section:, “prisoner”
(1) “Prisoner” means and includes all persons committed to the adult correctional
institution, in the custody of the warden, in the custody of any other officer while outside the
confines of the custodial unit, in the custody of the state director of behavioral healthcare,

developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to § 40.1-5.3-1, regardless of whether that
prisoner is held upon conviction or upon any criminal charge. “Prisoner” shall not include persons
on home confinement.
(2) "Resident" means and includes all persons detained at the training school for youth, in
the custody of the superintendent of the training school for youth, in the custody of any other
juvenile program worker while outside the confines of the custodial unit, or in the custody of the
state director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to § 40.1-
5.3-1, regardless of whether that person is held upon adjudication or upon any petition for
delinquency or waywardness. "Resident" shall not include persons on home confinement.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001336
========
LC001336 - Page 2 of 3